Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 G ENERAL PROVISIONS
12-8-24. Permits for solid waste or special solid waste handling, disposal, or thermal treatment technology facility; inspection of solid waste generators.

No person shall engage in solid waste or special solid waste handling in Georgia or construct or operate a solid waste handling facility in Georgia, except those individuals exempted from this part under Code Section 12-8-30.10, without first obtaining a permit from the director authorizing such activity.

No permit for a biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility shall be issued by the director unless the applicant for such facility demonstrates to the director that a need exists for the facility for waste generated in Georgia by showing that there is not presently in existence within the state sufficient disposal facilities for biomedical waste being generated or expected to be generated within the state. For purposes of this part, "biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility" means any facility that exists for the purpose of reducing the amount of biomedical waste disposed of through a process of combustion, with or without the process of converting such waste to energy.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to any biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility which is operated exclusively by a private biomedical waste generator on property owned by the private biomedical waste generator for the purpose of accepting biomedical waste exclusively from the private biomedical waste generator so long as the operation of the biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility does not adversely affect the public health or the environment. After commencement of operation by a private biomedical waste generator of a biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility which is permitted by but not included in a local or regional solid waste management plan, amendment of the local or regional solid waste management plan shall be required for any biomedical waste which is no longer to be disposed of by the private biomedical waste generator in its own biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility prior to any substantial reduction in the amount of biomedical waste produced by the private biomedical waste generator and accepted by its own biomedical waste thermal treatment technology facility or the closure of such facility.

On or after March 30, 1990, any permit for the transportation of municipal solid waste from a jurisdiction generating solid waste to a municipal solid waste disposal facility located in another county shall be conditioned upon the jurisdiction generating solid waste developing and being actively involved in, by July 1, 1992, a strategy for meeting the state-wide goal of waste reduction by July 1, 1996.

If the director determines that such activity will result in any violation of this part or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, he shall deny the permit; otherwise, he shall issue the permit, specifying on the permit the conditions under which such activity shall be conducted; provided, however, that a public hearing shall be held by the governing authority of the county or municipality in which the municipal solid waste or special solid waste handling shall occur not less than two weeks prior to the issuance of any permit under this Code section and notice of such hearing shall be posted at the proposed site and advertised in a newspaper of general circulation serving the county or counties in which the proposed activity will be conducted at least 30 days prior to such hearing.

Reserved.

The director may suspend, modify, or revoke any permit issued pursuant to this Code section if the holder of the permit is found to be in violation of any of the permit conditions or any order of the director or fails to perform solid waste handling in accordance with this part or rules promulgated under this part.

The director may modify any permit issued pursuant to this Code section in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. All modifications of existing permits shall be classified by the board as either major or minor modifications.

All modifications of existing permits to allow vertical or horizontal expansion of existing disposal facilities, except a facility operated by a utility regulated by the Public Service Commission, shall be classified as major permit modifications and shall not be granted by the director sooner than three years from the date any such facility commenced operation; provided, however, that a permit may be modified by the director to allow a vertical or horizontal expansion one time within three years from the date the facility commenced operation so long as the capacity of the facility is not increased more than 10 percent.

All modifications of permits for existing municipal solid waste disposal facilities for the addition at such facility of a recovered materials processing facility shall be classified as minor permit modifications, provided the location of such facility complies with the same buffer requirements applicable to the disposal facility. Such materials shall be reported at the disposal facility separately from waste materials destined for disposal. Operators of such disposal facilities may report to the Department of Community Affairs on an annual basis the total amounts of such materials diverted from landfill disposal.

The disposal facility permit holder shall provide written notification to the chief elected official of the jurisdiction in which the facility is located at least 30 days prior to starting any recovered materials processing facility. This notification shall include an indication of whether or not the ten-year demonstrated capacity of the landfill will be reduced. The permit holder shall comply with all applicable local zoning ordinances. If necessary to satisfy local solid waste planning and reporting requirements, disposal facility operators may be required by the county, municipality, or solid waste management authority for the jurisdiction in which the disposal facility is located to report the total amounts of such materials diverted from landfill disposal.

Prior to the granting of any major modification of an existing solid waste handling permit by the director, a public hearing shall be held by the governing authority of the county or municipality in which the municipal solid waste facility or special solid waste handling facility requesting the modification is located not less than two weeks prior to the issuance of any permit under this Code section and notice of such hearing shall be posted at the site of such facility and advertised in a newspaper of general circulation serving the county or counties in which such facility is located at least 30 days prior to such hearing.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, major modifications shall meet the siting and design standards applicable to new permit applications in effect on the date the modification is approved by the director; provided, however, that a facility may be granted a variance by the director from those standards when vertically expanded unless such variance is inconsistent with federal laws and regulations; provided, further, that the director shall not grant a variance from the provisions of subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) of paragraph (4) of this subsection.

No vertical expansions shall be approved under this subsection unless:

The owner or operator demonstrates compliance with all standards not varied by the director;

The owner or operator has installed a surface and ground-water monitoring system approved by the division under currently promulgated rules and has submitted the initial sampling results to the division;

The owner or operator has implemented or installed a methane gas monitoring program or system approved by the division under currently promulgated rules and has submitted the initial sampling results to the division;

The owner or operator has a closure and postclosure care plan approved by the division under currently promulgated rules;

Where noncompliance with the standards for surface water, ground water, or methane gas has been determined, the owner or operator has a schedule and corrective action plan approved by the division for returning the site to compliance within six months of the director's approval of the corrective action plan. If the owner or operator cannot demonstrate that the site can be returned to compliance within said six-month period, the director shall not issue a permit to expand the site vertically but shall order the facility to prepare a final closure plan, including the cessation of waste receipt within six months of the final effective date of the order; and

Where noncompliance with the standards for surface water, ground water, or methane gas may be determined and the permit has not been transferred to another person, the owner or operator has a remedial modification plan providing for the evacuation of all previously disposed waste from a permitted, unlined expansion site and redisposal of such waste into a conforming facility with a composite liner and leachate collection system. If noncompliance is determined, the director shall order the owner or operator to prepare a corrective action plan, which must be approved by the division, and such corrective action must be completed within the compliance time frame determined by the division. If the owner or operator cannot demonstrate that the site can be returned to compliance within such division compliance time frame, the director shall order the facility to prepare a final closure plan, including the cessation of waste receipt within 12 months of the final effective date of the order.

Modifications for vertical expansions issued under this Code section may be restricted in duration, but in no case shall be effective for municipal solid waste landfills not having liners and leachate collection systems, other than those landfills restricted to construction or demolition waste.

The owner or operator of any site not having a liner and leachate collection system which is vertically expanded and which subsequently fails to demonstrate compliance with all applicable surface water, ground-water, or methane gas standards shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director, through a corrective action plan, that the site has been or can be returned to compliance within six months of the director's approval of the corrective action plan. If the owner or operator fails to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director that compliance has been attained or can be attained, the director shall notify the owner or operator, ordering cessation of the acceptance of waste for disposal, remediation of noncompliance, and implementation of the final closure plan, to include a final date for closure.

In the event of the modification, suspension, amendment, or revocation of a permit, the director shall serve written notice of such action on the permit holder and shall set forth in such notice the reason for such action.

Prior to the issuance of any permit for a solid waste handling facility or the granting of any major modification of an existing solid waste handling permit, the director shall require written verification to be furnished by the applicant that the proposed facility complies with local zoning or land use ordinances, if any; and after July 1, 1992, that the proposed facility is consistent with the local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan developed in accordance with standards promulgated pursuant to this part subject to the provisions of Code Section 12-8-31.1 and that the host jurisdiction and all jurisdictions generating solid waste destined for the applicants' facility can demonstrate that they are part of an approved solid waste plan developed in accordance with standards promulgated pursuant to this part and are actively involved in and have a strategy for meeting the state-wide goal of waste reduction by July 1, 1996. Prior to the issuance of any permit for a solid waste handling facility or the granting of any major modification of an existing solid waste handling permit that will handle solid waste from jurisdictions outside Georgia, the out-of-state solid waste generating jurisdictions shall provide documentation that they have a strategy for and are actively involved in meeting planning requirements and a waste reduction goal that are substantially equivalent to the planning requirements and waste reduction goal contained in this part.

No permit for a disposal facility shall be issued to any regional solid waste management authority created under Part 2 of this article, the "Regional Solid Waste Management Authorities Act," until local and regional solid waste management plans consistent with this part have been developed for all jurisdictions participating in such authority and such plans are found to be consistent with the state solid waste management plan pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 12-8-31.1.

No permit shall be issued for a new solid waste thermal treatment technology facility unless the applicant meets or exceeds standards adopted by the board which shall be consistent with and at least as stringent as the Federal New Source Performance Standards for new municipal waste combustors outlined in regulations pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1857, et seq., as amended, and 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended.

The director or his designee is authorized to inspect any generator in Georgia to determine whether that generator's solid waste is acceptable for the intended handling facility. The division may require any generator in Georgia to cease offering solid waste for handling if such solid waste is not acceptable under standards promulgated by the board, and the division may prohibit the handling of such solid waste until waste management procedures acceptable to the division are developed. Such prohibition shall continue in effect until the waste management procedure for handling is approved in writing by the division. Any generator or handler in Georgia which does not comply with a prohibition made under this subsection shall be in violation of this part.

Any inert waste landfill which, as of January 1, 2014, has been certified by a professional engineer registered in accordance with Chapter 15 of Title 43 as being in full compliance with all permit by rule requirements established in the rules and regulations of the division as they existed on January 1, 2012, may continue to operate under such permit by rule requirements.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 462, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1922, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1081, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1641, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1247, § 7/SB 122; Ga. L. 2010, p. 235, § 1/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2013, p. 171, § 1/HB 320.)

Cross references.

- Granting of permission by counties to persons contracting to transport and dump trash, garbage, or other refuse at publicly or privately owned dumps,

§

36-1-16

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, "March 30, 1990" was substituted for "the effective date of this part" near the beginning of subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a comma was inserted following "March 30, 1990" in subsection (b) (now subsection (c)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "landfills" was substituted for "land fills" in paragraph (e)(5) and "42 U.S.C. Section 7401" was substituted for "42 U.S.C. 7401" in subsection (i).

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).
For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 16 (1992). For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-24.1. Certification of municipal solid waste disposal facility operators.

After July 1, 1992, no person shall perform the duties of a municipal solid waste disposal facility operator without being duly certified under this Code section.

After July 1, 1992, no municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be operated in Georgia unless the operator is certified under this Code section. All inspectors of municipal solid waste disposal facilities shall be certified to inspect the same.

The division is authorized to cooperate with the University System of Georgia or with any other appropriate organization approved by the director to develop a certification program which conforms with the requirements of this part. The division may classify all municipal solid waste disposal facilities required to have operators certified under this part with due regard to the size, type, character of the solid waste to be disposed of, and other physical conditions affecting such municipal solid waste disposal facilities according to the skill, knowledge, and experience that the operator in responsible charge must have to operate the facilities successfully so as to protect the public health and welfare and prevent environmental problems.

Any certificate granted under this Code section shall be renewable as provided by rules of the board.

The division shall approve all examinations and courses to be used in determining the knowledge, ability, and judgment of applicants for certification under this Code section.

Upon application, a certificate may be issued without examination in a comparable classification to any person who holds a valid current certificate in any state, territory, or possession of the United States or any other country, provided that the requirements for certification of operators under which the person's certificate was issued do not conflict with this part and are of a standard not lower than that specified by regulations adopted under this part and provided, further, that reciprocal privileges are granted to certified operators of this state.

The director may investigate the actions of any operator and may revoke or suspend the certificate of an operator when the director finds that the operator has practiced fraud or deception; that reasonable care or judgment or the application of his knowledge or ability was not used in the performance of his duties; or that the operator is incompetent or unable to perform his duties properly.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-24.2. Public hearing prior to entering contract regarding landfill.

The governing authority of any county or municipal corporation and the directors or managers of any local authority or special district shall hold a public hearing before entering into a contract for the sale, lease, or management of a landfill or solid waste disposal facility owned by such county, municipal corporation, local authority, or special district. The party responsible for holding such a public hearing shall cause notice of the hearing to be posted at the site of the landfill or facility and to run in a newspaper of general circulation serving the county, municipal corporation, local authority, or special district not less than 30 nor more than 45 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-24.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1081, § 2.)

12-8-24.3. Notification of contaminant release from landfill.

The owner or operator of a municipal solid waste landfill shall notify the local governing authorities of any city and county in which such landfill is located of any release from the site of such landfill of a contaminant which is likely to pose a danger to human health. In addition, such owner or operator shall cause notice of such release to be published in the legal organ of the county in which such landfill is located. Compliance with the requirements of this Code section shall occur within 14 days of confirmation of such release by the division.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-24.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 213, § 1/HB 1028.)

12-8-25. Sites in certain counties within one-half mile of adjoining county.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, to encourage cooperation between the various counties, from March 15, 1988, through April 1, 1990, no permit shall be issued for a solid waste disposal facility in any county having a population of more than 350,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census if any part of the site is within one-half mile of an adjoining county without the applicant's first receiving the express approval of the governing authority of that adjoining county; provided, however, that the director may permit such a facility if the applicant provides evidence that no alternative sites or methods are available in that jurisdiction for the handling of its solid waste. This paragraph shall apply to all permit applications that are pending or made on or after March 15, 1988, and to all permits issued prior to May 1, 1988, which permits are the subject of an appeal or judicial review and such appeal or judicial review is in process.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, until after April 1, 1990, no permit shall be issued to a private applicant for a solid waste disposal facility in any county of this state having a population of more than 350,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census if any part of the site is within two miles of an adjoining county without the applicant's first receiving express approval of the governing authority of the adjoining county. As used in this paragraph, the term "private applicant" means any private person, firm, corporation, or other private entity, and the term does not mean or include the United States government or any agency thereof, the State of Georgia or any agency, institution, or public authority thereof, or any county or municipality of this state. As used in this paragraph, the term "solid waste disposal facility" shall not mean or include any solid waste disposal facility which incorporates waste to energy processing, recycling, activities associated with the recycling process, or any combination of the foregoing.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, to encourage cooperation among the various cities and counties, after April 4, 1997, no permit shall be issued for a municipal solid waste disposal facility in any city or county if any part of the site is within one-half mile of the boundaries of such city or county adjoining any city or county in this state without the applicant's first receiving the express approval of the governing authority of that adjoining city or county; provided, however, that the director may permit such a facility if the applicant provides evidence that no alternative sites or methods are available in that jurisdiction or in any adjoining jurisdiction of the affected city and county for the handling of its solid waste. This paragraph shall apply to all permit applications that are pending on or made after April 4, 1997, and to all permits issued prior to such date, which permits are the subject of an appeal or judicial review and such appeal or judicial review is in process.

The consent of an adjoining city or county as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be required either by new permit or by modification of an existing permit when the expansion of an existing municipal solid waste disposal facility is granted by the director or when the ownership, direct or indirect, of an existing municipal solid waste disposal facility is transferred.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 447, §§ 1, 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, in paragraph (a)(3), "April 4, 1997" was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in two places and a comma was added in one place.

12-8-25.1. Sites within 5,708 yards of national historic site.

In order to preserve historic sites and their natural and built environments, no permit shall be issued for a solid waste disposal facility within 5,708 yards of the geographic center of any of the three sites currently designated in Georgia as a National Historic Site; provided, however, that the director may permit a solid waste disposal facility at such a site if the applicant provides evidence that no alternative sites or methods are available in that jurisdiction for the handling of its solid waste.
This Code section shall apply to all permit applications made on or after July 1, 1988, and to all permits issued prior to July 1, 1988, which permits are the subject of an appeal or judicial review and such appeal or judicial review is in process.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-25.2. Sites within two miles of significant ground-water recharge area.

No permit shall be issued for a municipal solid waste landfill if any part of the site is within two miles of an area that has been designated by the director as a significant ground-water recharge area unless such municipal solid waste landfill will have a liner and leachate collection system and meets any other requirements as may be established by rules and regulations of the board or pursuant to other geological considerations as may be determined appropriate by the director.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1222, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 6.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-25.3. Further restrictions on sites within significant ground-water recharge area or near military air space used as bombing range.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 12-8-25.2, no permit shall be issued for a municipal solid waste landfill which accepts solid waste generated from outside the county in which such landfill is located or, in the case of a regional landfill, from outside any of the counties or special districts empowered to engage in solid waste management activities constituting such region if any part of such site is within any area that has been designated by the director as a significant ground-water recharge area.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, in the case of a regional municipal solid waste landfill where any part of such site is within any area that has been designated by the director as a significant ground-water recharge area, no permit shall be issued for such regional landfill unless the boundaries of the counties or special districts empowered to engage in solid waste management activities are contiguous and such counties or special districts have entered into a joint contract for the collection and disposal of solid waste.

No permit or modification of an existing permit shall be issued for land application of untreated municipal sewage sludge located in an area designated by Hydrologic Atlas 18 prepared by the Department of Natural Resources as a significant ground-water recharge area including, but not limited to, those areas designated as probable areas of thick soils.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any administrative regulation or action to the contrary, no permit shall be issued for a municipal solid waste landfill within two miles of a federally restricted military air space which is used for a bombing range. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all permit applications pending on or after July 1, 1997, and to all permits denied prior to such date which are the subject of an appeal or judicial review pending on such date.

This subsection shall not prohibit or prevent any municipal solid waste landfill that was permitted and operational on July 1, 1997, from expanding its operation into an area outlined in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1025, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 928, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 25, § 1/SB 123.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 29, 2020, designated the existing provisions of subsection (d) as paragraph (d)(1) and added paragraph (d)(2).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "July 1, 1997," was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in the second sentence in subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1995, p. 1025,

§

3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in part that that Act shall not apply with respect to a site for which the Environmental Protection Division has issued a letter of site suitability prior to April 20, 1995.

12-8-25.4. Limits on the number of solid waste facilities within given area.

As provided for in Code Section 12-8-21, it is the policy of the State of Georgia to assure that solid waste facilities do not adversely affect the health, safety, and well-being of the public and do not degrade the quality of the environment. The General Assembly finds that an excessive concentration of solid waste facilities in any one community can adversely affect the health, safety, well-being, and environment of that community and impose an onus on the community without any reciprocal benefits to the community. The purpose of this Code section is to provide a limited degree of protection against any given community becoming an involuntary host to an excessive concentration of solid waste facilities.

No permit shall be issued under Code Section 12-8-24 for any solid waste handling facility other than a material recovery facility or compost facility or for any solid waste disposal facility other than a private industry solid waste disposal facility if any part of the premises proposed for permitting would lie within any geographic area which can be shown to meet the following criteria:

The geographic area is in the shape of a circle with a two-mile radius, the centerpoint of which circle may be any point within the premises proposed for permitting; and

The circular geographic area already includes all or a portion of three or more landfills within that portion of its territory which is within this state (including the landfill proposed for permitting in the case of a proposed expansion).

For the purposes of the criteria specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, the term "landfill" shall include:

Any active landfill permitted under authority of the state under this part or any prior general law of the state; and

Any inactive landfill so permitted under this part or any prior general law, which landfill ceased receiving waste on or after June 29, 1989, and is either in closure or postclosure status, provided that such a landfill which has completed postclosure care status shall no longer be included

but for purposes of subsection (b) of this Code section the count of landfills shall not include any permit by rule inert waste landfill or any private industry solid waste disposal facility; and in counting landfills each existing landfill site shall be counted only once even if such landfill site has previously been expanded under a new or existing permit, provided the facilities under each new or existing permit are the same type landfill, are owned by the same person, and are contiguous or if not contiguous are separated only by the width of a public road.

Subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply with respect to: (1) the permitting of a proposed horizontal expansion requiring a permit or a major modification of an existing permit; and (2) the permitting of a new site requiring a new permit; provided, however, that a permit for a vertical expansion not to exceed 5 million tons capacity may be granted if all permitted landfills wholly or partially in the two-mile radius circular geographic area are in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations and any applicable remedial plans have been implemented.

The board may by rule authorize an exemption from this Code section for one or more areas in the state if the board determines that compliance with this Code section is not reasonably practicable in such area or areas because of a high water table in such area or areas which limits the land area suitable for facility siting.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1025, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, "postclosure" was substituted for "post-closure" in two places in paragraph (c)(2) and "permit-by-rule" was substituted for "permit-by-Rule" in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "permit by rule" was substituted for "permit-by-rule" in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (c).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1995, p. 1025,

§

3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section is not applicable to a site for which the Environmental Protection Division has issued a letter of site suitability prior to April 20, 1995.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Conservation and Natural Resources:
Waste Management," see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011).

12-8-25.5. Locating disposal facility near private recreational camp.

No permit shall be issued for any new municipal solid waste disposal facility if any part of the premises proposed for permitting is within one mile of any private recreational camp operated primarily for use by persons under 18 years of age and which camp has been so operated at its location for 25 years or more.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-25.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 55, § 1.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2004, p. 55,

§

2(b), not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section shall apply to any permit application pending on or after April 1, 2004, and to any permit application denied prior to April 1, 2004, which is the subject of an appeal or judicial review pending on April 1, 2004.

12-8-26. Public meetings on site selection; notice; decision.

Any county, municipality, group of counties, or authority beginning a process to select a site for a municipal solid waste disposal facility must first call at least one public meeting to discuss waste management needs of the local government or region and to describe the process of siting facilities to the public. Notice of this meeting shall be published within a newspaper of general circulation serving such county or municipality at least once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of such meeting. A regional solid waste management authority created under Part 2 of this article must hold at least one meeting within each jurisdiction participating in such authority, and notice for these meetings must be published within a newspaper of general circulation serving each such jurisdiction at least once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of such meeting.

The governing authority of any county or municipality taking action resulting in a publicly or privately owned municipal solid waste disposal facility siting decision shall cause to be published within a newspaper of general circulation serving such county or municipality a notice of the meeting at which such siting decision is to be made at least once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of such meeting. Such notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of the meeting and the meeting shall be conducted by the governing authority taking the action. A siting decision shall include, but is not limited to, such activities as the final selection of property for landfilling and the execution of contracts or agreements pertaining to the location of municipal solid waste disposal facilities within the jurisdiction, but shall not include zoning decisions.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 7.)

Cross references.

- Permission by counties to persons contracting to transport and dump trash, garbage, or other refuse at publicly or privately owned dumps,

§

36-1-16

.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-27. Standards for handling special solid waste; transportation manifest; fees; inspection; prohibition of waste generated out-of-state; certification.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, § 7, effective April 5, 1993.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1990, p. 412,

§

1 and Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276,

§

8.